Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1513
Stay of execution; expiration; writ to issue; duty of clerk.

At the expiration of the stay the clerk shall issue a joint execution against the property of all the judgment debtors and sureties, describing them as debtors or sureties therein.

Laws 1875, § 9, p. 51;

R.S.1913, § 8054;

C.S.1922, § 8995;

C.S.1929, § 20-1513;

R.S.1943, § 25-1513.

Mandamus will lie to compel issuance of execution against both principal and sureties. State ex rel. Thorn v. Fleming, 21 Neb. 321, 32 N.W. 73 (1887).